Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Congressional Districts
118B.140.
Fourth Congressional District.

The Fourth Congressional District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Boone KY

County: Bracken KY

County: Campbell KY

County: Carroll KY

County: Carter KY (part)

A103 – Iron Hill (part)

210439603002006, 210439603002014, 210439604001000, 210439604001001, 210439604001002, 210439604001003, 210439604001004, 210439604001005, 210439604001006, 210439604001007, 210439604001008, 210439604001009, 210439604001010, 210439604001011, 210439604001012, 210439604001013, 210439604001014, 210439604001015, 210439604001016, 210439604001017, 210439604001018, 210439604001019, 210439604001020, 210439604001026, 210439604001027, 210439604001028, 210439604001029, 210439604001030, 210439604001031, 210439604001033, 210439604001034, 210439604001049, 210439604001050, 210439604001051, 210439604001052, 210439604001053, 210439604001054, 210439604001055, 210439604001058, 210439604001059, 210439604001060, 210439605002007, 210439605002008, 210439605002009, 210439605002010, 210439605002011, 210439605002012, 210439605002013, 210439605002014, 210439605002027

Click to view

D106 – Pleasant Valley (part)

210439602001000, 210439602001001, 210439602001002, 210439604002025, 210439604002033, 210439604002034, 210439604002035, 210439604002039

Click to view

E101 – Brickyard (part)

210439602001022

Click to view

E102 – Buffalo

E104 – Smokey Valley (part)

210439602001003, 210439602001004, 210439602001005, 210439602001006, 210439602001007, 210439602001008, 210439602001009, 210439602001014, 210439602001015, 210439602001016, 210439602001017, 210439602001019, 210439602001020, 210439602001021, 210439602001023, 210439604002017, 210439604002018, 210439604002019, 210439604002023, 210439604002030, 210439604002031

Click to view

E105 – Upper Tygart (part)

210439601001000, 210439601001001, 210439601001002, 210439601001004, 210439601001005, 210439601001006, 210439601001007, 210439601001008, 210439601001009, 210439601001023, 210439602001024, 210439602001025, 210439602001026, 210439602001027

Click to view

County: Gallatin KY

County: Grant KY

County: Greenup KY

County: Harrison KY

County: Henry KY

County: Kenton KY

County: Lewis KY

County: Mason KY

County: Nelson KY (part)

A105 – A5 (part)

211799305001007

Click to view

B101 – B1

B103 – B3 (part)

211799303043001, 211799303043002, 211799303043003, 211799303043005, 211799303043006, 211799303043009, 211799303043010, 211799303043011, 211799303043012, 211799303043013, 211799303043014, 211799303043015, 211799303043016, 211799303043017, 211799303043018, 211799303043019, 211799303043020, 211799303043021, 211799303043022, 211799303043023, 211799303043024, 211799303043025, 211799303043026, 211799303043027, 211799303043028, 211799303043029, 211799303043030, 211799303043031, 211799303043032, 211799305001001, 211799305001006, 211799305002007, 211799305002008, 211799305002029, 211799305002030, 211799305002037, 211799305002038, 211799305003002, 211799305003003, 211799305003006, 211799305003007, 211799305003008, 211799305003009, 211799305003017, 211799305003019, 211799305003020, 211799305003021, 211799305003022, 211799305003023, 211799305003024, 211799305003025, 211799305003031

Click to view

B104 – B4

D102 – D2

D103 – D3

D104 – D4

D105 – D5 (part)

211799302011004, 211799302011005, 211799302011006, 211799302011007, 211799302011009, 211799302011010, 211799302011011, 211799302011015, 211799303011014, 211799303011015, 211799303011016, 211799303011017, 211799303011018, 211799303011020, 211799303011029, 211799303011033, 211799303011034, 211799303011035, 211799303011036, 211799303011037, 211799303011038, 211799303011039, 211799303011040, 211799303011041, 211799303011046, 211799303011047, 211799303011048, 211799303011049, 211799303011050, 211799303011051, 211799303011055, 211799303012000, 211799303012001

Click to view

E101 – E1

E102 – E2

E103 – E3

E104 – E4

E105 – E5 (part)

211799303041000, 211799303041001, 211799303041002, 211799303041003, 211799303041005, 211799303041006, 211799303041007, 211799303041008, 211799303041013, 211799303042010, 211799303042011, 211799303044000, 211799303044001, 211799303044002, 211799303044003, 211799303044004, 211799303044005, 211799303044006, 211799303044008, 211799303044010, 211799303044011, 211799303044012, 211799303051019, 211799303051020, 211799303051022, 211799303051023

Click to view

County: Oldham KY

County: Owen KY

County: Pendleton KY

County: Robertson KY

County: Shelby KY

County: Spencer KY

County: Trimble KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4, effective December 20, 1991; 1994, ch. 497, § 6, effective November 9, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 142, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2012, ch. 3, § 4, effective February 10, 2012; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 8, § 4, effective January 20, 2022.

118B.150.
Fifth Congressional District.

The Fifth Congressional District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bath KY (part)

A101 - Sharpsburg No. 1 (part)

210119701002016, 210119701002017, 210119701002027, 210119701002028, 210119701002029, 210119701002030, 210119701002031, 210119701002032, 210119701002033, 210119701002034, 210119701002035, 210119701002036, 210119701002037, 210119701002038, 210119701002041, 210119701002044, 210119702021003, 210119702021004, 210119702021008

Click to view

A102 - Sharpsburg No. 2 (part)

210119701001036, 210119701001038, 210119701001039, 210119701001040, 210119701002003, 210119701002004, 210119701002015, 210119701002018, 210119701002019, 210119701002020, 210119701002021, 210119701002022, 210119701002023, 210119701002024, 210119701002025, 210119701002026

Click to view

A105 - Owingsville No. 1 (part)

210119702021033, 210119702021034, 210119702021035, 210119702021036, 210119702021037, 210119702021038, 210119702021039, 210119702021040, 210119702021041, 210119702021042, 210119702021044, 210119702021045, 210119702021046, 210119702021049, 210119702021075

Click to view

B102 - Owingsville No. 2

B103 - Owingsville No. 3

C101 - Salt Lick No. 1

C102 - Salt Lick No. 2

C103 - White Sulphur

C104 - Olympia

County: Bell KY

County: Boyd KY

County: Breathitt KY

County: Carter KY (part)

A101 - Courthouse

A102 - Gregoryville

A103 - Iron Hill (part)

210439605002020

Click to view

A104 - North Midland Trail

A105 - Oakland

B101 - East Grayson/Stinson

B102 - North Rush

B103 - South Midland Trail

B104 - South Rush

B105 - Stovall

C101 - Alpha Hall

C102 - Denton

C103 - Hitchins

C104 - Willard

D101 - Cedar Grove

D102 - Clark Hill

D103 - Eagle Hall

D104 - Grahn

D105 - Pleasant Hill

D106 - Pleasant Valley (part)

210439603001000, 210439603001001, 210439603001002, 210439603001011, 210439603001012, 210439603002002, 210439603002004, 210439603002011, 210439603002012, 210439603002013, 210439603002015, 210439603002016, 210439603002019, 210439603002021, 210439603002022, 210439603002023, 210439603002025, 210439603002037

Click to view

D107 - Soldier

E101 - Brickyard (part)

210439602001028, 210439602001029, 210439602001030, 210439602001031, 210439602001032, 210439602001033, 210439602001035, 210439602001037, 210439602001038, 210439602001039, 210439602001040, 210439602001041, 210439602001042, 210439602001043, 210439602001044, 210439602001045, 210439602001051, 210439602001052, 210439602001053, 210439602001054, 210439602001055, 210439602001056, 210439602001057, 210439602001058, 210439602001059, 210439602001062, 210439602001074

Click to view

E103 - Olive Hill Courthouse

E104 - Smokey Valley (part)

210439602001018, 210439602003003, 210439602003004, 210439602003005, 210439602003011, 210439602003013, 210439602003016, 210439602003018, 210439602003019, 210439602003020, 210439602003021, 210439602003022, 210439602003023, 210439602003024, 210439602003025, 210439602003026, 210439602003027, 210439602003028, 210439602003029, 210439602003030, 210439602003031, 210439602003032, 210439602003033, 210439602003034, 210439602003040, 210439602003041

Click to view

E105 - Upper Tygart (part)

210439601001003, 210439601001010, 210439601001011, 210439601001012, 210439601001013, 210439601001014, 210439601001015, 210439601001016, 210439601001017, 210439601001018, 210439601001019, 210439601001020, 210439601001021, 210439601001022, 210439601001024, 210439601001025, 210439601001026, 210439601001027, 210439601001028, 210439601001029, 210439601001030, 210439601001031, 210439601001032, 210439601001033, 210439601001034, 210439601001035, 210439601001036, 210439601001037, 210439601001038, 210439601001039, 210439601001040, 210439601001041, 210439601001042, 210439601001043, 210439601001044, 210439601001045, 210439601001046, 210439601001048, 210439601001049, 210439601001050

Click to view

County: Clay KY

County: Elliott KY

County: Floyd KY

County: Harlan KY

County: Jackson KY

County: Johnson KY

County: Knott KY

County: Knox KY

County: Laurel KY

County: Lawrence KY

County: Lee KY

County: Leslie KY

County: Letcher KY

County: Lincoln KY

County: Magoffin KY

County: Martin KY

County: McCreary KY

County: Menifee KY

County: Morgan KY

County: Owsley KY

County: Perry KY

County: Pike KY

County: Pulaski KY

County: Rockcastle KY

County: Rowan KY

County: Wayne KY

County: Whitley KY

County: Wolfe KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 5, effective December 20, 1991; 1994, ch. 497, § 7, effective November 9, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 143, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2012, ch. 3, § 5, effective February 10, 2012; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 8, § 5, effective January 20, 2022.

118B.160.
Sixth Congressional District.

The Sixth Congressional District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Anderson KY (part)

A101 - East Lawrenceburg

A102 - Duncan

B101 - West Lawrenceburg

B102 - West Duncan

C101 - Lillard

C102 - Witherspoon

D101 - Mcbrayer

D102 - South Lillard

E101 - Alton (part)

210059501011000, 210059501011004, 210059501011005, 210059501011006, 210059501011007, 210059501011008, 210059501011009, 210059501011011, 210059501011012, 210059501011013, 210059501011014, 210059501011015, 210059501011016, 210059501011017, 210059501011019, 210059501021000, 210059501021001, 210059501021002, 210059501021003, 210059501021004, 210059501021005, 210059501021006, 210059501021007, 210059501021008, 210059501021009, 210059501021010, 210059501021011, 210059501021012, 210059501021013, 210059501021014, 210059501021015, 210059501022000, 210059501022001, 210059501022002, 210059501023000, 210059501023001, 210059501023002, 210059501023003, 210059501023004

Click to view

E103 - West Alton (part)

210059501012004, 210059501012005, 210059501012006, 210059501012007, 210059501012008, 210059501012009, 210059501012010, 210059501012011, 210059501012012, 210059501012013, 210059501012014, 210059501012015, 210059501012016, 210059501022004

Click to view

F101 - Hickory Grove

F103 - Rutherford (part)

210059504001052, 210059504001053, 210059504001054, 210059504001055, 210059504001057, 210059504001063, 210059504001064, 210059504001065, 210059504001069, 210059504001070, 210059504001071, 210059504001072, 210059504001073, 210059504001074, 210059504001075, 210059504001076, 210059504001077, 210059504001078

Click to view

F104 - Birdie (part)

210059503001062, 210059503001063, 210059503001064, 210059503001065

Click to view

County: Bath KY (part)

A101 - Sharpsburg No. 1 (part)

210119701002039, 210119701002040, 210119701002042, 210119701002043, 210119701002047, 210119701002048, 210119701002049, 210119701002053, 210119701002055, 210119701002056, 210119701002057, 210119701002058, 210119701002059, 210119701002061, 210119701002062, 210119701002063, 210119701002064, 210119702021009

Click to view

A102 - Sharpsburg No. 2 (part)

210119701002000, 210119701002001, 210119701002002, 210119701002005, 210119701002006, 210119701002007, 210119701002008, 210119701002009, 210119701002010, 210119701002011, 210119701002012, 210119701002013, 210119701002014, 210119701002045, 210119701002046, 210119701002050, 210119701002051, 210119701002052, 210119701002054, 210119701002060

Click to view

A103 - Bethel

A104 - South Sherburne

A105 - Owingsville No. 1 (part)

210119702021005, 210119702021006, 210119702021007, 210119702021014, 210119702021015, 210119702021016, 210119702021017, 210119702021018, 210119702021019, 210119702021020, 210119702021021, 210119702021022, 210119702021023, 210119702021024, 210119702021028, 210119702021029, 210119702021030, 210119702021031, 210119702021032, 210119702021052, 210119702021053, 210119702021054, 210119702021055, 210119702021056, 210119702021057, 210119702021058, 210119702021059, 210119702021060, 210119702021061, 210119702021062, 210119702021063, 210119702021064, 210119702021065, 210119702021066, 210119702021071, 210119702021072, 210119702022021, 210119702022022, 210119702022023, 210119702022047, 210119702022048

Click to view

B104 - Preston

County: Bourbon KY

County: Clark KY

County: Estill KY

County: Fayette KY

County: Fleming KY

County: Garrard KY

County: Jessamine KY

County: Madison KY

County: Mercer KY

County: Montgomery KY

County: Nicholas KY

County: Powell KY

County: Scott KY

County: Woodford KY

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 6, effective December 20, 1991; 1994, ch. 497, § 8, effective November 9, 1994; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 144, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2012, ch. 3, § 6, effective February 10, 2012; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 8, § 6, effective January 20, 2022.